Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.315.245

Adjustment of assets and liabilities.

In determining an equitable adjustment of assets and liabilities, the negotiating school districts and the regional committee shall consider the following factors:

(1) The number of school-age children residing in each school district and in each part of a district involved or affected by the proposed change in school district organization;

(2) The assessed valuation of the property located in each school district and in each part of a district involved or affected by the proposed change in school district organization;

(3) The purpose for which the bonded indebtedness of any school district involved or affected by the proposed change in school district organization was incurred;

(4) The history and relationship of the property affected to the students and communities affected by the proposed change in school district organization;

(5) Additional burdens to the districts affected by the proposed change in school district organization as a result of the proposed organization;

(6) The value, location, and disposition of all improvements located in the school districts involved or affected by the proposed change in school district organization;

(7) The consideration of all other sources of funding; and

(8) Any other factors that in the judgment of the school districts or regional committee are important or essential to the making of an equitable adjustment of assets and liabilities.

[ 1999 c 315 s 701.]